Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,138
Nail technology establishment; license required.

No person shall operate or profess or attempt to operate a nail technology establishment unless such establishment is licensed by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. The department shall not issue or renew a license for a nail technology establishment until all requirements of the act have been complied with. No person shall engage in any of the practices of nail technology in any location or premises other than a licensed nail technology or cosmetology establishment except as specifically permitted in the act.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,208;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 400.